src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-lex_kukke_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - kukke: # 
    kukke+A+Attr: kuhes
    kukke+A+Sg+Nom: kukke
    kukke+A+Sg+Gen: kuhe
    kukke+A+Sg+Ill: kuukán
    kukke+A+Sg+Loc: kuhheest
    kukke+A+Sg+Com: kuhhijn
    kukke+A+Sg+Abe: kuhettáá
    kukke+A+Ess: kukken
    kukke+A+Par: kukked
    kukke+A+Pl+Nom: kuheh
    kukke+A+Pl+Gen: [kuhij, kuuhij]
    kukke+A+Pl+Acc: kuuhijd
    kukke+A+Pl+Ill: kuhhijd
    kukke+A+Pl+Loc: kuuhijn
    kukke+A+Pl+Com: [kuhijguin, kuhijgijn]
    kukke+A+Pl+Abe: kuhijttáá

    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: kuhheeb
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: kuhheeb
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: kuhebân
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: kuhebist
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: kuhebáin
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: kuhheebttáá
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: kuhebin
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: kuhebid
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: kuhebeh
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: kuhebij
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: kuhebijd
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: kuhebáid
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: kuhebijn
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [kuhebijguin, kuhebijgijn]
    kukke+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: kuhebijttáá

    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: kuhemus
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: kuhemuu
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: kuhemusân
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: kuhemuust
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: kuhemuin
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: kuhemuuttáá
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: kuhemussân
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: kuhemussâd
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: kuhemuuh
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: kuhemui
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: kuhemuid
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: kuhemuid
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: kuhemuin
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [kuhemuiguin, kuhemuigijn]
    kukke+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: kuhemuittáá
